Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.140

Registration of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders—Duty to register.

The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall continue for the duration provided in this section.

(1) For an adult convicted in this state of a class A felony, or an adult convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense who has one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the duty to register shall continue indefinitely.

(2) For an adult convicted in this state of a class B felony who does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the duty to register shall end fifteen years after the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the adult has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(3) For an adult convicted in this state of a class C felony, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the adult does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the duty to register shall end ten years after the last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the adult has spent ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(4)(a) For a person required to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b), the duty to register will end three years after the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition if the person is required to register for a class A offense committed at age 15, 16, or 17.

(b) For a person required to register under RCW 9A.44.130(1)(b) who does not meet the description provided in subsection (4)(a) of this section [(a) of this subsection], the duty to register will end two years after the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition.

(5) Except as provided in RCW 9A.44.142, for a person required to register for a federal, tribal, or out-of-state conviction, the duty to register shall continue indefinitely.

(6) For a person who is or has been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, the duty to register shall continue for the person's lifetime.

(7) Nothing in this section prevents a person from being relieved of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.142, 9A.44.143, and 13.40.162.

(8) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an offender shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.

(9) For purposes of determining whether a person has been convicted of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex offender or kidnapping offender is not a sex or kidnapping offense.

(10) The provisions of this section and RCW 9A.44.141 through 9A.44.143 apply equally to a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

[ 2023 c 150 s 7; 2020 c 249 s 2; 2015 c 261 s 6; 2010 c 267 s 4; 2002 c 25 s 1; 2001 c 170 s 2; 2000 c 91 s 3; 1998 c 220 s 3; 1997 c 113 s 4; 1996 c 275 s 12. Prior: 1995 c 268 s 4; 1995 c 248 s 2; 1995 c 195 s 2; 1991 c 274 s 3; 1990 c 3 s 408.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Application—2010 c 267: See note following RCW 9A.44.128.

Effective date—2002 c 25: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 12, 2002]." [ 2002 c 25 s 3.]

Intent—2001 c 170: "The legislature intends to amend the lifetime sex offender registration requirement so that it is narrowly tailored to meet the requirements of the Jacob Wetterling act." [ 2001 c 170 s 1.]

Severability—1998 c 220: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Findings—1997 c 113: See note following RCW 4.24.550.

Finding—1996 c 275: See note following RCW 9.94A.505.

Purpose—1995 c 268: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Finding and intent—1991 c 274: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.